en: Heavy Machinery
xx: Heavy Machinery
cs: Těžká stavební technika
da: Store maskiner
de: Schwermaschinen
es: Maquinaria pesada
fr: Machinerie lourde
it: Macchinari pesanti
ja: 重機
nl: Zwaar materieel
no: Tungt maskineri
pl: Ciężki sprzęt
pt: Maquinaria pesada
ru: Тяжелое оборудование
sv: Anläggningsmaskiner
tr: Ağır İş Makineleri

en: Chippers
xx: Chippers
cs: Drtiče
da: Flishugger
de: Häcksler
es: Astilladoras
fr: Déchiqueteuses
it: Truciolatori
ja: 粉砕機
nl: Versnipperaars
no: Fliskuttere
pl: Rębaki
pt: Trituradoras
ru: Рубительные машины
sv: Flismaskiner
tr: Ağaç Yonga Makineleri

en: Hotel & Hospitality
xx: Hotel & Hospitality
cs: Hotely a ubytovací služby
da: Hotel og overnatning
de: Hotels & Gaststätten
es: Hostelería y hospedaje
fr: Hôtel et service d'accueil
it: Alberghi e ospitalità
ja: ホテル・サービス業
nl: Hotel en accommodatie
no: Hotell og overnatting
pl: Hotelarstwo
pt: Hotel e hospitalidade
ru: Гостиничный бизнес
sv: Hotellverksamhet
tr: Otel ve Ağırlama

en: Industrial Storage
xx: Industrial Storage
cs: Průmyslové skladování
da: Opbevaring til industri
de: Gewerbliche Lagerung
es: Almacenamiento industrial
fr: Stockage industriel
it: Stoccaggio industriale
ja: 業務用ストレージ
nl: Industriële opslag
no: Industrilagring
pl: Magazynowanie
pt: Armazenamento industrial
ru: Товары для хранения промышленной продукции
sv: Industrilager
tr: Endüstriyel Depolama

en: Industrial Cabinets
xx: Industrial Cabinets
cs: Průmyslové skříňky
da: Industriskabe
de: Industrieschränke
es: Armarios industriales
fr: Armoires industrielles
it: Armadi industriali
ja: 業務用キャビネット
nl: Industriële kasten
no: Industriskap
pl: Szafy przemysłowe
pt: Armários industriais
ru: Промышленные шкафы
sv: Lagerskåp
tr: Endüstriyel Dolaplar

en: Industrial Shelving
xx: Industrial Shelving
cs: Průmyslové regály
da: Industrireoler
de: Industrieregale
es: Estanterías industriales
fr: Étagères industrielles
it: Scaffalature industriali
ja: 業務用棚・シェルフ
nl: Industriële stellingen
no: Industrihyller
pl: Regały przemysłowe
pt: Prateleiras industriais
ru: Промышленные стеллажи
sv: Lagerhyllor
tr: Endüstriyel Raflar

en: Shipping Containers
xx: Shipping Containers
cs: Přepravní kontejnery
da: Skibscontainere
de: Frachtcontainer
es: Contenedores para transporte
fr: Conteneurs
it: Container per spedizioni
ja: 出荷用コンテナ
nl: Zeecontainers
no: Transportcontainere
pl: Kontenery transportowe
pt: Contêineres para transporte
ru: Контейнеры для транспортировки
sv: Fraktcontainrar
tr: Nakliye Konteynırları

en: Wire Partitions\, Enclosures & Doors
xx: Wire Partitions\, Enclosures & Doors
cs: Drátěné přepážky\, klece a dveře
da: Trådnetafskærmninger\, -indhegninger og -døre
de: Zäune\, Einfriedungen & Türen
es: Particiones\, cierres y puertas de tela metálica
fr: Cloisons\, clôtures et portes grillagées
it: Porte\, divisori e recinti in rete metallica
ja: メッシュフェンス
nl: Metalen veiligheidshekken\, -wanden en -deuren
no: Skillevegger\, inngjerdinger og dører i metall
pl: Przegrody\, klatki i drzwi z siatki
pt: Compartimentos e portas de tela
ru: Перегородки\, барьеры и двери из проволочной сетки
sv: Ståltrådspaneler\, -inhägnader och -dörrar
tr: Tel Bölmeler\, Dolaplar ve Kapılar

en: Industrial Storage Accessories
xx: Industrial Storage Accessories
cs: Průmyslové skladování – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til industriel opbevaring
de: Aufbewahrungszubehör für industrielle Zwecke
es: Accesorios para almacenaje industrial
fr: Accessoires de stockage industriel
it: Accessori per lo stoccaggio industriale
ja: 業務用ストレージ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor industriële opslag
no: Oppbevaringstilbehør for industrien
pl: Akcesoria magazynowe
pt: Acessórios para armazenamento industrial
ru: Принадлежности для хранения промышленной продукции
sv: Tillbehör för industriell förvaring
tr: Endüstriyel Depolama Aksesuarları

en: Janitorial Carts & Caddies
xx: Janitorial Carts & Caddies
cs: Uklízecí vozíky
da: Rengøringsvogne og holdere til rengøringsudstyr
de: Reinigungswagen
es: Carretones y caddies de mantenimiento
fr: Chariots d'entretien
it: Carrelli e carretti per pulizie
ja: 清掃カート/バケツ
nl: Schoonmaakkarren en -wagens
no: Vaktmester- og rengjøringsvogner
pl: Wózki do sprzątania
pt: Carrinhos e baldes para limpeza
ru: Уборочные тележки
sv: Städvagnar och -fordon
tr: Temizlik Görevlisi Araçları ve Arabaları

en: Law Enforcement
xx: Law Enforcement
cs: Bezpečnostní složky
da: Politi
de: Strafverfolgung
es: Mantenimiento del orden público
fr: Maintien de l'ordre public
it: Imposizione della legge
ja: 警察
nl: Wetshandhaving
no: Politiarbeid
pl: Organy ścigania
pt: Aplicação das leis
ru: Товары для обеспечения правопорядка
sv: Ordningsmakt och säkerhet
tr: Kolluk Kuvvetleri Ekipmanları

en: Cuffs
xx: Cuffs
cs: Pouta
da: Lænker
de: Schellen
es: Sujeciones mecánicas
fr: Menottes
it: Manette
ja: 拘束具
nl: Boeien
no: Hånd-/fotjern
pl: Kajdanki
pt: Punhos
ru: Кандалы
sv: Bojor
tr: Kelepçeler

en: Metal Detectors
xx: Metal Detectors
cs: Detektory kovů
da: Metaldetektorer
de: Metalldetektoren
es: Detectores de metal
fr: Détecteurs de métaux
it: Metal detector
ja: 金属探知機
nl: Metaaldetectoren
no: Metalldetektorer
pl: Wykrywacze metalu
pt: Detectores de metal
ru: Металлоискатели
sv: Metalldetektorer
tr: Metal Dedektörleri

en: Manufacturing
xx: Manufacturing
cs: Výroba
da: Produktion
de: Herstellung
es: Fabricación
fr: Secteur manufacturier
it: Produzione
ja: 製造
nl: Productie
no: Produksjon
pl: Produkcja przemysłowa
pt: Manufatura
ru: Производство
sv: Tillverkning
tr: İmalat

en: Material Handling
xx: Material Handling
cs: Manipulace s materiálem
da: Materialehåndtering
de: Materialbeförderung
es: Manipulación de materiales
fr: Manipulation de matériel
it: Movimentazione di materiali
ja: 運搬
nl: Materiaalbehandeling
no: Materialhåndtering
pl: Transport materiałów
pt: Manuseio de materiais
ru: Оборудование для транспортировки материалов
sv: Materialhantering
tr: Malzeme Taşıma

en: Conveyors
xx: Conveyors
cs: Dopravníkové pásy
da: Transportører
de: Förderanlagen
es: Cintas transportadoras
fr: Convoyeurs
it: Nastri trasportatori
ja: 運搬装置
nl: Transportbanden
no: Transportbånd
pl: Przenośniki
pt: Transportadoras
ru: Конвейеры
sv: Rullband
tr: Konveyörler

en: Lifts & Hoists
xx: Lifts & Hoists
cs: Zvedací zařízení
da: Hejseværk
de: Aufzüge & Hebeeinrichtungen
es: Izado y subida
fr: Ascenseurs et monte-charge
it: Elevatori e paranchi
ja: リフト・ホイスト
nl: Takelen en heffen
no: Løfteutstyr og heiser
pl: Narzędzia do wciągania i podnoszenia
pt: Içamento
ru: Подъёмные устройства
sv: Lyftanordningar
tr: Asansörler ve Kaldıraçlar

en: Hoists\, Cranes & Trolleys
xx: Hoists\, Cranes & Trolleys
cs: Kladkostroje\, jeřáby a vozíky
da: Hejseværk\, kraner og løbekatte
de: Hebezüge\, Kräne & Laufkatzen
es: Montacargas\, grúas y trolleys
fr: Monte-charge\, grues et chariots
it: Paranchi\, gru e carrelli
ja: クレーン・台車
nl: Takels\, kranen en steekwagens
no: Heiseapparater\, kraner og løpekatter
pl: Podnośniki\, dźwigi i wózki
pt: Elevadores\, guindastes e troles
ru: Тали\, краны и вагонетки
sv: Hissverk\, lyftkranar och kranvagnar
tr: Kaldıraçlar\, Vinçler ve El Arabaları

en: Jacks & Lift Trucks
xx: Jacks & Lift Trucks
cs: Hevery a vysokozdvižné vozíky
da: Donkrafte og løftevogne
de: Hubwagen
es: Carretillas elevadoras
fr: Crics et chariots élévateurs
it: Cric e carrelli elevatori
ja: ジャッキ・フォークリフト
nl: Krikken en vorkheftrucks
no: Jekker og  gaffeltrucker
pl: Podnośniki i wózki widłowe
pt: Empilhadeiras e macacos
ru: Подъёмники и погрузчики
sv: Gaffel- och lyfttruckar
tr: Krikolar ve Forkliftler

en: Personnel Lifts
xx: Personnel Lifts
cs: Osobní výtahy
da: Personlifte
de: Personenaufzüge
es: Elevadores personales
fr: Nacelles élévatrices
it: Elevatori per personale
ja: 高所作業台
nl: Personenliften
no: Lifter
pl: Podesty ruchome
pt: Elevadores para funcionários
ru: Лифты для персонала
sv: Personlyftar
tr: Personel Asansörleri